Louisiana, session 2026, HB908.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 49:222(B)(1)(b) through (g), (2)(a) through (c), (3), (4)(a) through
(c), (e), and (f), (5)(b) through (e), (6), (7), (11) through (13), (14)(b), (15)(b), and (16)(b)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§222. Fees chargeable by secretary of state
* * *
B. The secretary of state is authorized to collect the following fees:
(1) Domestic business corporations and limited liability companies.
* * *
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 908 ENROLLED
(b) Seventy-five Ninety-five dollars for filing and recording corporation
articles of incorporation, articles of amendment, articles of restatement, articles of
domestication, articles of charter surrender, articles of nonprofit conversion, articles
of nonprofit domestication and conversion, articles of dissolution, articles of
revocation of dissolution, articles of reinstatement, articles of merger or share
exchange, abandonment proceedings, simplified articles of termination, and articles
of correction.
(c) One hundred twenty-five dollars for filing and recording limited liability
company articles of organization, amended articles of organization, dissolution
proceedings, termination of dissolution proceedings, reinstatement proceedings,
merger proceedings, conversions, and certificates of correction.
(d) Twenty Twenty-five dollars for filing any other document or issuing and
sealing any other certificate required or permitted by the Business Corporation Act,
R.S. 12:1-101 et seq., or the Limited Liability Company Law, R.S. 12:1301 et seq.
(e) Twenty-five Thirty dollars for a corporation's statement of change of
registered agent or registered office, or both, the resignation of an agent or officer,
appointment of a registered agent, change of domicile, appointment of new officers,
directors, members, or managers, and change of address for agents, officers,
directors, members, or managers.
(f) Twenty-five Thirty dollars for a supplemental initial report for a limited
liability company.
(g) Thirty Thirty-five dollars for annual reports.
(2) Domestic nonprofit corporations.
(a) Seventy-five Ninety-five dollars for filing and recording articles of
incorporation, amended articles of incorporation, dissolution proceedings,
termination of dissolution proceedings, reinstatement proceedings, merger
proceedings, conversions, and certificates of correction.
(b) Twenty Twenty-five dollars for issuing and sealing any other certificate
required or permitted by the Nonprofit Corporation Law, R.S. 12:201 et seq.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 908 ENROLLED
(c) Twenty-five Thirty dollars for the resignation of an agent or officer;
appointment of a registered agent; change of domicile; appointment of new officers
or directors; and change of address for agents, officers, or directors.
* * *
(3) Foreign corporations and limited liability companies.
(a) One hundred twenty-five fifty-five dollars for filing and recording
applications for authority on corporations, amended applications, withdrawal
proceedings, termination of withdrawal proceedings, reinstatement proceedings,
merger proceedings, and certificates of correction.
(b) One hundred fifty eighty-five dollars for filing and recording applications
for authority on limited liability companies, amended applications, withdrawal
proceedings, termination of withdrawal proceedings, reinstatement proceedings,
merger proceedings, and certificates of correction.
(c) Twenty Twenty-five dollars for issuing and sealing any other certificate
required or permitted by the Foreign Corporation Law, R.S. 12:301 et seq., or the
Limited Liability Company Law, R.S. 12:1301 et seq.
(d) Twenty-five Thirty dollars for the resignation of an agent or officer;
appointment of a registered agent; change of domicile; appointment of new officers,
directors, members, or managers; and change of address for agents, officers,
directors, members, or managers.
(e) Thirty Thirty-five dollars for annual reports.
(4) Partnerships and registered limited liability partnerships.
(a) One hundred fifty eighty-five dollars for filing of partnership forms and
filing of amendments of a foreign partnership.
(b) One hundred fifty eighty-five dollars for the termination of the
registration of a foreign partnership.
(c)(i) For partnerships, one hundred twenty-five dollars for filing a contract
of partnership of a domestic partnership or a registered limited liability partnership,
and filing an amendment, merger, consolidation, or termination of a domestic
partnership.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 908 ENROLLED
(ii) For registered limited liability partnerships, one hundred twenty-five
fifty-five dollars for filing original or renewal forms, conversions to and from a
registered limited liability company, and merger or consolidation of a registered
limited liability partnership.
* * *
(e) Twenty Twenty-five dollars for additional certificates for partnerships
or additional certificates for registered limited liability partnerships.
(f) Thirty Thirty-five dollars for annual reports for partnerships.
(5) Trade names, trademarks, and service marks.
* * *
(b) Seventy-five Ninety-five dollars for registering, renewing, assigning, or
terminating a trade name, trademark, or service mark.
(c) Fifteen Twenty dollars for issuing a copy of any trade name, trademark,
or service mark document.
(d) Fifteen Twenty dollars for sealing and certifying to correctness of a trade
name, trademark, or service mark document on file.
(e) Twenty Twenty-five dollars for additional certificates.
(6) One hundred twenty-five dollars for conversion from or to a partnership,
including the conversion of a limited liability company from or to a partnership.
(7) Twenty-five Thirty dollars for collection of agency registration.
* * *
(11) General Fees.
(a) Fifteen Twenty dollars for additional certified copies.
(b) Twenty Twenty-five dollars for additional certificates.
(c) Twenty-five Thirty dollars for certified copies with amendments.
(d) Twenty-five Thirty dollars for copies with amendments.
(12) Special fees.
(a) There shall be a fifty sixty-dollar fee for expedited "while you wait"
service.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 908 ENROLLED
(b) There shall be a thirty thirty-five dollar fee for expedited twenty-four-
hour service.
(c) There shall be a fifty sixty dollar fee for receipt of service of process or
other instruments.
(13) Sixty Seventy-five dollars for filing applications and issuing certificates
for state franchises to offer cable service or video service in this state.
(14) Home Service Contract Provider Applications.
* * *
(b) Two hundred fifty dollars for filing renewals, amendments, financial
statements, and reports for home service contract providers.
(15) Motor vehicle service contract applications.
* * *
(b) Two hundred fifty dollars for filing renewals and amendments for motor
vehicle service contract providers.
(16) Structured settlement purchase company registrations.
* * *
(b) Two hundred fifty dollars for filing renewals and amendments for
structured settlement purchase company registration.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on October 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.